Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 6 TERMINATION OF THE PARENT-CHILD LEGAL RELATIONSHIP
19-3-612. Reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship - circumstances - petition - hearings - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that, for various reasons, some children are not adopted after the termination or voluntary relinquishment of the parent-child legal relationship and in some cases might benefit from a reinstatement of the parent-child legal
relationship if the former parent has remediated the issues that led to the termination or voluntary relinquishment. The purpose of this section is to address the problem of children who linger in the child welfare system by giving
them a second chance at achieving permanency with their rehabilitated former parent. The purpose of this section is to create a process by which the former parent's legal rights may be restored if certain conditions are met, both
the child and the former parent want reinstatement of the relationship, a trial period is successful, and it is found to be in the best interests of the child. Reinstatement is a recognition that the situation of the former parent
and child has changed since the time of the termination or voluntary relinquishment of the parent-child legal relationship, and reunification is now appropriate and in the best interests of the child.

A county department with custody of a child whose parent's rights were terminated voluntarily or involuntarily, including a child whose parent relinquished the child pursuant to the requirements of article 5 of this title 19, or the guardian ad litem
of such a child, may file a petition to reinstate the parent-child legal relationship alleging the following:

The child is twelve years of age or older; or

The child is younger than twelve years of age and is part of a sibling group, as defined in section 19-1-103, that includes a child described in subsection (2)(a)(I) of this section for whom a petition to reinstate the parent-child legal relationship
has been filed, and the younger sibling independently meets the conditions set forth in subsections (2)(b) to (2)(f) of this section;

Both the child and the former parent consent to the petition for reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship;

The child does not have a legal parent, is not in an adoptive placement, and is not likely to be adopted within a reasonable period of time, and other permanency options have been exhausted;

The child is in the legal custody of a county department;

The date of the final order terminating the parent-child legal relationship was at least three years before the filing of the petition or, if the court finds that it is in the best interests of the child to consider a petition for reinstatement of the
parent-child legal relationship, less than three years from the date of the final order terminating the parent-child legal relationship; and

The dependency and neglect action did not involve substantiated allegations of sexual abuse or an incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, a near fatality, or a suspicious fatality or near fatality as those terms are defined in section
26-1-139, C.R.S.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until January 9, 2023.] A child who is sixteen years of age or older, or his or her guardian ad litem, may also file a petition to reinstate the parent-child legal relationship alleging that
the conditions set forth in paragraphs (b) to (f) of subsection (2) of this section are met.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
A child who is twelve years of age or older, or the child's guardian ad litem, may also file a petition to reinstate the parent-child legal relationship alleging that the conditions set forth in subsections (2)(b)
to (2)(f) of this section are met.

If a former parent whose rights have been terminated contacts either the county department that has custody of the child or the child's guardian ad litem about the possible reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship through a petition filed
pursuant to this section, the county department or the guardian ad litem who was contacted shall notify the other party, as applicable, and the court within thirty days after the contact with the name and address of the former
parent.

If a petition to reinstate the parent-child legal relationship is filed, a former parent who is named in the petition and whose rights the petition seeks to have reinstated is entitled to appointed counsel through the office of the respondent parents'
counsel pursuant to article 92 of title 13 if the former parent meets the income eligibility criteria for public counsel, or the former parent may retain counsel at his or her own expense.

The petition must state the name and age of the child; the county department that has legal custody of the child; and the name and address of the former parent named in the petition. The petition shall be verified, and the statements in the petition may
be made upon information and belief. The party filing a petition to reinstate the parent-child legal relationship shall serve the petition on the following nonmovants:

The child's guardian ad litem;

The county department with legal custody of the child; and

The former parent whose parent-child legal relationship the petition seeks to have reinstated.

Upon receipt of the petition for reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship, the court must set a date for an initial hearing to take place no more than sixty-three days after the filing of the petition. The court shall provide notice of all
hearings and reviews to:

The county department with legal custody of the child;

The guardian ad litem;

The former parent whose parent-child legal relationship the petition seeks to have reinstated;

The foster parents, if any; and

The child's tribe if the child is an Indian child.

At the initial hearing and all subsequent hearings on the petition, the court shall consider information from the county department with legal custody of the child, the child, the child's guardian ad litem, the former parent, the person or agency that
is providing care for the child, and any other person or agency that may aid the court in its review.

At the initial hearing, the court shall consider and make findings about the following threshold conditions for pursuing a reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship:

Whether the allegations for filing the petition in paragraphs (a) to (f) of subsection (2) of this section or in subsection (3) of this section have been established by clear and convincing evidence;

Whether the child is of a sufficient age and maturity and able to express his or her preference about reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship;

Whether the former parent has remedied the conditions that led to the child's removal and termination of the parent-child legal relationship, if applicable;

What temporary transition services would be needed by the child and the former parent to have a successful reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship;

Whether the former parent can provide a safe and stable home for the child; and

Whether the former parent has participated in an assessment that supports that the reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship is in the best interests of the child. The state board may adopt rules defining the types of assessments that may be
done to support reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship. A previous finding of termination does not disqualify the former parent from being certified as an appropriate placement for a trial period under this
section.

At the conclusion of the initial hearing, the court shall either dismiss the petition because the threshold conditions for reinstatement set forth in subsection (9) of this section have not been met or enter an order finding that the threshold conditions
for reinstatement set forth in subsection (9) of this section have been met and that it is in the best interests of the child to work toward reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship. If the court finds that it is in
the best interests of the child to pursue reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship, the court must approve a transition plan developed by the county department and designed for reinstatement of the parent-child legal
relationship, including visitation or placement of the child with the former parent for a designated trial period of up to six months, during which time legal custody of the child remains with the county department. As part of
the transition plan, the county department shall provide transition services, as needed. The county department shall assess the visitation or temporary placement of the child with the former parent and prepare a report about the
success of the visitation or temporary placement. The county department shall submit the report to the court, the former parent, and the guardian ad litem not later than thirty days prior to the expiration of the designated trial
period. The county department may stop the visitation or remove the child from placement with the former parent at any time, in accordance with the procedures outlined in sections 19-3-401 and 19-3-403, if it deems that the child
is not safe or that it is no longer in the best interests of the child for the child to remain with the former parent.

The court shall schedule a final hearing prior to the expiration of the designated trial period. At the final hearing, the court shall consider the following:

Whether the threshold criteria for reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship set forth in subsection (9) of this section are still met;

Whether the trial period of visitation or placement of the child with the former parent was successful;

Whether the child will lose or gain any benefits or services as a result of reinstatement and how this might affect the child; and

Whether reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship is in the best interests of the child.

The court shall make findings supporting the disposition of the petition for reinstatement. The court may make the following orders:

The court may grant the petition and order the reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that it is in the best interests of the child to reinstate the parent-child legal relationship; or

The court may dismiss the petition, in which case:

The county department retains the legal custody of the child; and

The county department shall arrange for the immediate placement of the child in out-of-home placement; and

The court shall set a hearing to determine the permanency plan in accordance with section 19-3-702; or

The court may continue the matter for no more than sixty days and may issue an order requiring the former parent or the county department to take certain actions before the next hearing; except that the court shall either dismiss or grant a motion for
reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship within twelve months after the date the petition for reinstatement was filed.

An order reinstating the parent-child legal relationship restores all rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations of the former parent as to the child, including those relating to custody, control, and support of the child. If the
parent-child legal relationship is reinstated, the court may require periodic review within ninety days after reinstatement.

The granting of a petition for reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship does not vacate or otherwise affect the validity of the original order terminating the parent-child legal relationship.

The granting of a petition for reinstatement of the parent-child legal relationship for one former parent does not restore or otherwise impact the rights or legal status of the other former parent.

A parent whose parent-child legal relationship is restored pursuant to this section is not liable for child support or the costs of any services provided to the child from the date of the original order terminating the parent-child legal relationship
to the date of the order reinstating the parent-child legal relationship.

This section does not create a cause of action against the county department or its employees concerning the original order terminating the parent-child legal relationship. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or alter the protections granted
to public entities and to their employees under the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2014:
Entire section added, (SB 14-062), ch. 77, p. 310, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2019:
(5) amended, (HB 19-1104), ch. 14, p. 56, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2020:
(1), IP(2), and (4) amended, (HB 20-1104), ch. 50, p. 174, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2021:
(2)(a)(II) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 733, § 80, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(3) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 437, § 13, effective January 9, 2023.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.